Maryland, session 2025, SB0849.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
13–4001.
In this subtitle, “Program” means the Professional and Volunteer Firefighter
Innovative Cancer Screening Technologies Program.
13–4006.
(a) (1) For fiscal years 2021 through 2024, the Governor shall include at least
$100,000 in the annual budget for the Program.
(2) For fiscal year 2025 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Governor may
include at least [$500,000] $3,000,000 $1,000,000 in the annual budget for the Program.
– 1 –

Ch. 640 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) Appropriations and expenditures made for the purpose of implementing the
Program, including the use of any funds received by a person under any component of the
Program, are subject to audit by the Office of Legislative Audits as provided in § 2–1220 of
the State Government Article.
(C) THE SECRETARY MAY USE UP TO 20% OF PROGRAM FUNDS TO SUPPORT
ACADEMIC MEDICAL RESEARCH CENTERS, INCLUDING THE UNIVERSITY OF
MARYLAND INSTITUTE FOR HEALTH COMPUTING, IN THE COLLECTION, ANALYSIS,
AND PROCESSING OF PROGRAM OUTCOME DATA FOR THE PURPOSES OF ASSESSING,
MAXIMIZING, AND IMPROVING THE EFFECTIVENESS AND CLINICAL UTILITY OF THE
CANCER SCREENING FUNDED BY THE PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of June 30, 2030,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –